West Virginia, session 2026, HB4322.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Social Work. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-30-6 of this code, relating to the Board of Social Work (fee schedule, 25 CSR 03), is authorized.